District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3602

Fraudulent acts unlawful.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 623, Pub. L. 88-503, § 32
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-2602.
1973 Ed., § 2-2402.